South Dakota, session 2026, HB1261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. The state treasurer shall transfer $101 from the South Dakota housing
infrastructure fund to the general fund.
Section 2. There is appropriated $101 from the general fund and $101 from the budget
reserve fund, to the Department of Revenue, for replacing the revenue forgone by the
application of a property tax credit to owner-occupied single-family dwellings, as provided in
section 3 of this Act.
Section 3. For property taxes payable in 2027, a county treasurer shall apply a tax credit to
each tax bill sent, pursuant to § 10-21-1.1, to an owner of an owner-occupied single-family
dwelling. The amount of the tax credit is the lesser of five hundred dollars or the total amount
of property tax imposed on the owner-occupied single-family dwelling in 2027.
Section 4. The secretary of the Department of Revenue shall approve vouchers and the state
auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 5. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.